Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2670.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-207, to read: START_STATUTE23-207. Employers; workplace communication; civil action; exclusions; definitions A. An employer, including this state and any instrumentality or political subdivision of this state, may not coerce, interfere with or threaten an employee with discharge, discrimination, RETALIATION, penalty or other adverse employment action because the employee declines to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or affirmatively declines to participate in or receive communications related to the employer's religious beliefs or political matters. B. An aggrieved employee may BRING a civil action to enforce this section not later than one hundred twenty days after the date of the alleged violation. C. An employer who violates this section is liable to the employee for all of the following: 1. Injunctive relief. 2. Reinstatement to the employee's former position or an equivalent position. 3. Back pay and reestablishment of employee benefits, including Seniority to which the employee would otherwise have been eligible if the violation had not occurred and any other appropriate relief. 4. Reasonable attorney fees and costs. D. Within thirty days after the effective date of this section, an employer that is subject to this section shall post a notice of employee rights under this section where employee notices are customarily placed. E. This section does not restrict any of the following: 1. An employer or the employer's agent, representative or designee from communicating information that is required by law. 2. An employer or the employer's agent, representative or designee from communicating information that is necessary for employees to perform job duties. 3. An institution of higher education or an agent, representative or designee of the institution of higher education from meeting with or participating in communications that are part of coursework curriculum, any symposia or an academic program. F. This section does not apply to a religious corporation, entity, association, educational institution or society that is exempt from requirements of title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (P.L. 88-352; 78 Stat. 255; 42 united states code section 2000e through e-17). G. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Political matters" includes information that relates to any of the following: (a) Elections for political office. (b) Political parties. (c) Federal, state or local legislation. (d) Federal regulation or state or local rules. (e) Public policy. (f) Supporting a political party or a civic, community, fraternal or labor organization. 2. "Religious beliefs" means matters that relate to religious affiliation and practice and information on how to join or support any religious organization or association. END_STATUTE